Idaho, session 2026, H0648.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 18, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-1854, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-1854. ANTICANCER MEDICATIONS. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Anticancer medication" means a drug or biologic used to kill,
slow, or prevent the growth of cancerous cells, whether administered
orally, intravenously, or by injection.
(b) "Health benefit plan" shall have the same meaning as provided in
section 41-5903, Idaho Code.
(2) A health benefit plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027,
covering food and drug administration-approved anticancer medications
shall ensure that coverage for prescribed orally administered anticancer
medication is subject to the same plan design cost sharing with respect to
copayment, coinsurance, and deductible of an injected or intravenously ad-
ministered anticancer medication.
(3) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit a health ben-
efit plan from administering a formulary or preferred drug list, requiring
prior authorization, or imposing other appropriate utilization controls in
approving coverage for any anticancer medication.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.